Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 48
IDAHO EDUCATIONAL TECHNOLOGY INITIATIVE

Section.

33-4801. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Educational Technology Initiative of 1994.”

33-4802. Findings.

The legislature hereby finds, determines, and declares that the state of Idaho recognizes the importance of applying technology to meet the public need for an improved, thorough, and seamless public education system for elementary and secondary education, education of the hearing or visually impaired, postsecondary and higher education, and public libraries. The legislature has funded technology infrastructure to enable the state’s public schools to have the necessary technology that supports student learning, but many districts are unable to maximize the technology infrastructure at the classroom level by adding digital content and curriculum.

33-4803. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Educational segments” are, individually, the public elementary and secondary school system, the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind, the career technical education system, the commission for libraries, the state historical society, Idaho public television, the community colleges, the four-year colleges and universities, the state department of education and the office of the state board of education.

“Libraries” means district, city, school/community libraries, and the commission for libraries as described in chapters 25, 26 and 27, title 33, Idaho Code.

“Technology” means all present and future forms of computer hardware, computer software and services used or required for automated data processing, computer-related office automation or telecommunications.

“Telecommunications” means all present and future forms of hardware, software or services used or required for transmitting voice, data, video or images over a distance.

33-4804. Public school digital content and curriculum fund.

There is hereby established in the state treasury the public school digital content and curriculum fund, to be administered by the state department of education, which shall make available moneys in the fund, subject to appropriation, for schools to provide Idaho classrooms, including classrooms at the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind, with digital content and curriculum that directly impact student achievement and improve performance. Curriculum programs shall be designed to enhance outcomes for students in career technical education, character education, enrichment activities, reading and mathematics, and activities that increase grade-to-grade promotion and enhance career and college readiness. Moneys from the fund may also be spent on academic text support systems that include authentic fiction and nonfiction books, provide reader supports, provide teaching tools, and promote parent engagement. Moneys in the fund shall consist of legislative appropriations and are continuously appropriated for the purposes identified in this section. Any interest earned on idle moneys in the fund shall be returned to the fund.

Subject to availability, moneys in the fund shall be distributed at the request of a local education agency (LEA) and shall be based on the amount requested. A single request must not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Distributions from the fund shall be made on a first-come, first-served basis to LEAs that meet the criteria outlined in this subsection. If an LEA meets such criteria but a distribution cannot be made due to lack of available moneys, such LEA’s request shall be prioritized, in the order received, once moneys become available. Two (2) or more LEAs may jointly request a distribution. To qualify for funding, an LEA must:

Have technology infrastructure in place to facilitate usage of the digital content and curriculum; and

Submit an explanation for how the distribution will be used to improve performance and enhance student achievement. Explanations should include:

The amount of moneys requested;

The type of content or curriculum to be purchased;

How the purchase will assist the LEA in meeting its identified measurable targets from its continuous improvement plan as described in section 33-320, Idaho Code; and

How progress toward those targets will be measured.

Additional distributions shall be granted to an LEA only if, after the initial distribution, the LEA has met or is making demonstrable progress toward its measurable targets.

33-4805. Evaluations and audits.

The legislative services office shall, from time to time as directed by the legislature, evaluate and audit the relative impact, costs and benefits of each of the educational technology programs conducted pursuant to this chapter. The state department of education shall report to the legislature and the governor each year on or before October 1 as to the relative impact, cost and benefit of the educational technology program conducted pursuant to this chapter.

33-4806. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-4807. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-4808. Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are hereby declared severable, and in the event that any word, phrase, sentence, clause, paragraph or section of this chapter be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid for any reason, such partial invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter.

33-4809. Higher education information technology committee. [Repealed.]

33-4810. Public education information technology committee. [Repealed.]

33-4811. Technology pilot projects. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 338, § 7, effective July 1, 2014.